Utah statutes.
79-4-202.   Director -- Qualifications -- Duties.
(1)  The director is the executive and administrative head of the division.
(2)  The director shall demonstrate:
(a)  executive ability; and
(b)  actual experience and training in the conduct of park and recreational
systems involving both physical development and program.
(3)  The director shall:
(a)  enforce the policies and rules of the board; and
(b)  perform the duties necessary to:
(i)  properly care for and maintain any property under the jurisdiction of the
division; and
(ii)  carry out this chapter.
(4)  The director shall acquire, plan, protect, develop, operate, use, and
maintain park area and facilities in accordance with the policies and rules of
the board.
